Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.700.090

Grants for state or industry certification testing fees.

(1) Subject to funds appropriated for this purpose, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide grants to eligible students to offset the costs of required examination or testing fees associated with obtaining state or industry certification in the student's career and technical education program.

(2) The office shall establish maximum grant amounts and a process for students to apply for the grants.

(3) For the purposes of this section, "eligible student" means:

(a) A student enrolled in a secondary career and technical education program where state or industry certification can be obtained without additional postsecondary work or study; or

(b) A student who completed a secondary career and technical education program in a Washington public school and is seeking state or industry certification in a program requiring additional postsecondary work or study or where there are age limitations on certification.

(4) Eligible students must have a family income that is at or below two hundred percent of the federal poverty level using the most current guidelines available from the United States department of health and human services.

[ 2008 c 170 s 302.]